District of Columbia statutes.
47-1023

Young Women’s Christian Association — Accrued liability.

The Young Women’s Christian Association of the District of Columbia is hereby relieved from any accrued liability to the United States or the District of Columbia for taxes imposed upon any of the property of such Association located in the District of Columbia for any tax period during which such property was occupied and used by such Association for its legitimate purposes.

History

June 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 709, ch. 461, § 2
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1023.
1973 Ed., § 47-816.